Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,121
Personalized message license plates; transfer; credit allowed; fee.

(1) The owner of a motor vehicle or trailer bearing personalized message license plates may make application to the county treasurer to have such license plates transferred to a motor vehicle or trailer other than the motor vehicle or trailer for which such license plates were originally purchased if such motor vehicle or trailer is owned by the owner of the license plates.

(2) The owner may have the unused portion of the message plate fee credited to the other motor vehicle or trailer which will bear the license plate at the rate of eight and one-third percent per month for each full month left in the registration period.

(3) Application for such transfer shall be accompanied by a fee of three dollars. The fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 121;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 74;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 41.